New Jersey, session 221, S1829.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    N.J.S.3B:12-25 is amended to read as follows: 3B:12-25.   Appointment of guardian. The Superior Court may determine the incapacity of an alleged incapacitated person and appoint a guardian for the person, guardian for the estate, or a guardian for the person and estate.  The appointed guardian shall perform the duties and responsibilities of guardianship in the best interest of the incapacitated person, whether appointed as guardian for the person, guardian for the estate, or guardian of the person and estate.  Letters of guardianship shall be granted to the spouse or domestic partner, as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3), of the incapacitated person if the spouse [is] or domestic partner was living with the incapacitated person as [man and wife] a spouse or as a domestic partner [as defined in section 3 of P.L.2003, c.246 (C.26:8A-3)] at the time the incapacitation arose[, or] . If no spouse or domestic partner is available, able, or willing to accept letters of guardianship, then the letters of guardianship shall be granted to the incapacitated person's heirs[,] or friends [, or thereafter] .  Thereafter, first consideration shall be given to the Office of the Public Guardian for Elderly Adults in the case of adults within the statutory mandate of the office[, or if] .  If none of them will accept the letters or it is proven to the court that no appointment from among them will be to the best interest of the incapacitated person or the estate, then letters of guardianship shall be issued to any other proper person as will accept the same, and if applicable, in accordance with the professional guardianship requirements of P.L.2005, c.370 (C.52:27G-32 et al.). Consideration may be given to surrogate decision-makers, if any, chosen by the incapacitated person before the person became incapacitated by way of a durable power of attorney pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2000, c.109 (C.46:2B-8.4), health care proxy or advance directive.  Consideration may also be given to a person or persons who can demonstrate that they provided previous care in the best interest of the incapacitated person or the incapacitated persons estate. The Office of the Public Guardian for Elderly Adults shall have the authority to not accept guardianship in cases determined by the public guardian to be inappropriate or in conflict with the office. (cf: P.L.2005, c.370, s.13) 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.